Louisiana, session 2026, HB765.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1269(D)(1)(a) and (E)(2)(introductory paragraph) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1269. Liability policy; insolvency or bankruptcy of insured and inability to effect
service of citation or other process; direct action against insurer
* * *
D.(1)(a) In those instances where direct action is not otherwise authorized
by law, at the time that a judgment is to be entered, or a settlement is reached during
the pendency of litigation, a liability insurer may be joined on motion of any party
as a party defendant solely for the purposes of entering final judgment or enforcing
the settlement.
* * *
E. In addition to any other restriction provided by law, a liability insurer
denying coverage shall do the following:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1110 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 765
(2) Within sixty days of the later of compliance with Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection and after receipt or waiver of notice pursuant to Paragraph (D)(2) of this
Section, but in no case later than thirty days before trial, the insured the insurer shall
give notice to all counsel of record in a cause of action against the insured that a
reservation of rights has been issued and also give notice to its named insurer provide
written notice to all counsel of record in the cause of action that a reservation of
rights has been issued and shall provide written notice to the named insured, in the
same manner as provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection that either:
* * *